Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-413] Interim measure for
assuring continuation of services. If funds are appropriated and
available, the chief procurement officer, or a designee, may extend the term of
a contract which has not terminated for up to six months after the termination
date of the contract, to assure the provision of services to the public without
disruption. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next